Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-511
Bonded indebtedness; election required; manner of submission.

At the time of or before incurring any bonded indebtedness the question shall be submitted to the people in the manner provided by law in cases of borrowing money for internal improvements.

Laws 1891, c. 36, § 7, p. 290;

R.S.1913, § 1930;

C.S.1922, § 1871;

C.S.1929, § 31-609;

R.S.1943, § 31-511.

To carry bond issue, favorable vote of two-thirds of electors was required. Lang v. Sanitary District of Norfolk, 160 Neb. 754, 71 N.W.2d 608 (1955).